Utah statutes.
57-11-10.   Renewal report -- Renewal fee -- Examination by division -- Annual reports.

(1) (a)  Within 30 days after each annual anniversary date of the division's registration of subdivided lands, the subdivider shall file a renewal report in the form prescribed by the division together with a renewal fee of $200.

(b)  The report shall reflect any material changes in information contained in the original application for registration, including any change in ownership of the subdivider.

(c)  The report shall also indicate the number of units in the subdivision that have been disposed of since the division registered the subdivided lands.

(2) (a)  The division may, upon the filing of a renewal report, initiate a renewal examination of the kind described in Section 57-11-8.

(b)  If the division determines upon inquiry and examination that any of the requirements of Section 57-11-8 have not been met, it shall notify the subdivider that the report, the promotional plan, or the plan of disposition must be corrected within 20 days or any additional time allowed by the division.

(c)  If the requirements are not met within the time allowed, the division may, notwithstanding the provisions of Section 57-11-13 and without further notice, issue a cease and desist order according to the emergency procedures of Title 63G, Chapter 4, Administrative Procedures Act, barring further sale of the subdivided lands.

(3)  The division may permit the filing of annual reports within 30 days after the anniversary date of the consolidated registration in lieu of the anniversary date of the original registration.



Amended by Chapter 382, 2008 General Session

